Utah statutes.
53-15-102.   Purpose.
(1)  The Legislature recognizes that children are often in dangerous
situations that may be threatening or frightening to them and that there is a
need for "safe homes" in our neighborhoods where a child may go for help.
(2)  The Legislature also recognizes that along with the need for "safe homes"
that children can recognize easily, there is needed a method by which these
homes can be identified.
(3)  The purpose of this chapter is to:
(a)  provide and designate a recognizable symbol for those "safe homes" that
children can readily identify; and
(b)  establish a method by which local law enforcement agencies can identify
and train volunteers who are willing to make their homes "safe homes".
